Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 7. Transitional Provisions.

Sec. 45.29.702.
Savings clause.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

45.29.702

—

45.29.709

, this chapter applies to a transaction or lien within the scope of this chapter, even if the transaction or lien was entered into or created before July 1, 2001.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

45.29.703

—

45.29.709

,

transactions and liens that were not governed by former AS 45.09, were validly entered into or created before July 1, 2001, and would be subject to this chapter if they had been entered into or created on or after July 1, 2001, and the rights, duties, and interests flowing from those transactions and liens remain valid on and after July 1, 2001; and

the transactions and liens may be terminated, completed, consummated, and enforced as required or permitted under this chapter or by the law that otherwise would apply if this chapter had not taken effect.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000; am § 23 ch 22 SLA 2001)

Cross references. —

See also AS

45.29.802

and

45.29.811

.

Sec. 45.29.703.
Security interest perfected before effective date.

A security interest that is enforceable June 30, 2001, and would have priority over the rights of a person who becomes a lien creditor June 30, 2001, is a perfected security interest under this chapter if, on July 1, 2001, the applicable requirements for enforceability and perfection under this chapter are satisfied without further action.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

45.29.705

, if, on June 30, 2001, a security interest is enforceable and would have priority over the rights of a person who becomes a lien creditor June 30, 2001, but the applicable requirements for enforceability or perfection under this chapter are not satisfied on July 1, 2001, the security interest

is a perfected security interest until July 1, 2002;

remains enforceable on and after July 1, 2002, only if the security interest becomes enforceable under AS

45.29.203

before July 1, 2002; and

remains perfected on and after July 1, 2002, only if the applicable requirements for perfection under this chapter are satisfied before July 1, 2002.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

See also AS

45.29.803

.

Sec. 45.29.704.
Security interest unperfected before effective date.

A security interest that is enforceable June 30, 2001, but that would be subordinate to the rights of a person who becomes a lien creditor June 30, 2001,

remains an enforceable security interest until July 1, 2002;

remains enforceable on and after July 1, 2002, if the security interest becomes enforceable under AS

45.29.203

on July 1, 2001, or before July 1, 2002; and

becomes perfected

without further action on July 1, 2001, if the applicable requirements for perfection under this chapter are satisfied before July 1, 2001; or

when the applicable requirements for perfection are satisfied if the requirements are satisfied on or after July 1, 2001.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

See also AS

45.29.804

.

Sec. 45.29.705.
Effectiveness of action taken before effective date.

If action, other than the filing of a financing statement, is taken before July 1, 2001, and the action would have resulted in priority of a security interest over the rights of a person who becomes a lien creditor had the security interest become enforceable before July 1, 2001, the action is effective to perfect a security interest that attaches under this chapter before July 1, 2002. An attached security interest becomes unperfected on July 1, 2002, unless the security interest becomes a perfected security interest under this chapter before July 1, 2002.

The filing of a financing statement before July 1, 2001, is effective to perfect a security interest to the extent the filing would satisfy the applicable requirements for perfection under this chapter.

This chapter does not render ineffective an effective financing statement that, before July 1, 2001, is filed and satisfies the applicable requirements for perfection under the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in former AS 45.09.103. However, except as otherwise provided in (d) and (e) of this section and AS

45.29.706

, the financing statement ceases to be effective at the earlier of

the time the financing statement would have ceased to be effective under the law of the jurisdiction in which it is filed; or

June 30, 2006.

The filing of a continuation statement on or after July 1, 2001, does not continue the effectiveness of the financing statement filed before July 1, 2001. However, upon the timely filing of a continuation statement on or after July 1, 2001, and in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in AS

45.29.301

—

45.29.342

, the effectiveness of a financing statement filed in the same office in that jurisdiction before July 1, 2001, continues for the period provided by the law of that jurisdiction.

The provisions of (c)(2) of this section apply to a financing statement that, before July 1, 2001, is filed against a transmitting utility and satisfies the applicable requirements for perfection under the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in former AS 45.09.103 only to the extent that AS

45.29.301

—

45.29.342

provides that the law of a jurisdiction other than the jurisdiction in which the financing statement is filed governs perfection of a security interest in collateral covered by the financing statement.

A financing statement that includes a financing statement filed before July 1, 2001, and a continuation statement filed on or after July 1, 2001, is effective only to the extent that it satisfies the requirements of AS

45.29.501

—

45.29.525

for an initial financing statement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

See also AS

45.29.805

.

Administrative Code. —

For document recording and filing, see 11 AAC 6.

Sec. 45.29.706.
When initial financing statement suffices to continue effectiveness of financing statement.

The filing of an initial financing statement in the office specified in AS

45.29.501

continues the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before July 1, 2001, if

the filing of an initial financing statement in that office would be effective to perfect a security interest under this chapter;

the pre-effective date financing statement was filed in an office in another state or another office in this state; and

the initial financing statement satisfies (b) of this section.

The filing of an initial financing statement under (a) of this section continues the effectiveness of the pre-effective date financing statement if the initial financing statement is filed

before July 1, 2001, for the period provided in former AS 45.09.403 with respect to a financing statement; and

on or after July 1, 2001, for the period provided in AS

45.29.515

with respect to an initial financing statement.

To be effective for purposes of (a) of this section, an initial financing statement must

satisfy the requirements of AS

45.29.501

—

45.29.524

for an initial financing statement;

identify the pre-effective date financing statement by indicating the office in which the financing statement was filed and providing the dates of filing and file numbers, if any, of the financing statement and of the most recent continuation statement filed with respect to the financing statement; and

indicate that the pre-effective date financing statement remains effective.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

See also AS

45.29.806

.

Administrative Code. —

For document recording and filing, see 11 AAC 6.

Sec. 45.29.707.
Amendment of pre-effective date financing statement.

On or after July 1, 2001, a person may add or delete collateral covered by, continue or terminate the effectiveness of, or otherwise amend the information provided in, a pre-effective date financing statement only in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in AS

45.29.301

—

45.29.342

. However, the effectiveness of a pre-effective date financing statement also may be terminated in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction in which the financing statement is filed.

Except as otherwise provided in (c) of this section, if the law of this state governs perfection of a security interest, the information in a pre-effective date financing statement may be amended on or after July 1, 2001, only if

the pre-effective date financing statement and an amendment are filed in the office specified in AS

45.29.501

;

an amendment is filed in the office specified in AS

45.29.501

concurrently with, or after the filing in that office of, an initial financing statement that satisfies AS

45.29.706(c)

; or

an initial financing statement that provides the information as amended and satisfies AS

45.29.706(c)

is filed in the office specified in AS 45.29.501.

If the law of this state governs perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a pre-effective date financing statement may be continued only under AS

45.29.705(d)

and (f) or

45.29.706

.

Whether or not the law of this state governs perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a pre-effective date financing statement filed in this state may be terminated on or after July 1, 2001, by filing a termination statement in the office in which the pre-effective date financing statement is filed, unless an initial financing statement that satisfies AS

45.29.706(c)

has been filed in the office specified by the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in AS

45.29.301

—

45.29.342

as the office in which to file a financing statement.

In this section, “pre-effective date financing statement” means a financing statement filed before July 1, 2001.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

See also AS

45.29.807

.

Administrative Code. —

For document recording and filing, see 11 AAC 6.

Sec. 45.29.708.
Persons entitled to file initial financing statement or continuation statement.

A person may file an initial financing statement or a continuation statement under AS

45.29.702

—

45.29.709

if

the secured party of record authorizes the filing; and

the filing is necessary under AS

45.29.702

—

45.29.709

to

continue the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before July 1, 2001; or

perfect or continue the perfection of a security interest.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

See also AS

45.29.808

.

Administrative Code. —

For document recording and filing, see 11 AAC 6.

Sec. 45.29.709.
Priority.

This chapter determines the priority of conflicting claims to collateral. However, if the relative priorities of the claims were established before July 1, 2001, former AS 45.09 determines priority.

For purposes of AS

45.29.322(a)

, the priority of a security interest that becomes enforceable under AS

45.29.203

dates from July 1, 2001, if the security interest is perfected under this chapter by the filing of a financing statement before July 1, 2001, that would not have been effective to perfect the security interest under former AS 45.09. This subsection does not apply to conflicting security interests each of which is perfected by the filing of such a financing statement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

See also AS

45.29.809

.